Maine, session 132, LD1790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6431, sub-§1-B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 512, §2, is amended
to read:
1-B. Compliance with interstate fishery management plan. The commissioner may
adopt rules to set minimum and maximum lobster sizes different from those specified in
subsection 1 when When necessary to comply with changes to the Atlantic States Marine
Fisheries Commission Interstate Fishery Management Plan for American Lobster regarding
minimum and maximum lobster sizes different from those specified in subsection 1, the
commissioner shall submit legislation to the Legislature with proposed minimum and
maximum lobster sizes. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A. The commissioner shall notify the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over marine resources
matters when initiating rulemaking pursuant to this subsection.